Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,101
Pharmacy inspector.

Only a licensed pharmacist who is or who has been engaged in the active practice of pharmacy shall be appointed by the department to serve as a pharmacy inspector with the consent and approval of the board.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 991.